Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,245
Violations; penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of section 60-6,244 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. In the event of such conviction, as a part of the judgment of conviction, the trial judge shall direct the person so convicted to produce in court or submit to the prosecuting attorney, before such person again operates the motor vehicle upon a highway, satisfactory proof showing that the brake equipment involved in the person's conviction has been made to conform with the requirements of such section. The failure, refusal, or neglect of the convicted person to abide by such direction in the judgment of conviction shall be deemed an additional offense for which the person shall be prosecuted.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 341.